Rhode Island statutes. Title 22 General Assembly
Chapter 7.10 Permanent Joint Committee on Energy

22-7.10-1.
Permanent committee — Composition.

There is created a permanent joint committee of the general assembly on energy to consist of eight (8) members of the general assembly, four (4) of whom shall be from the senate to be appointed by the president of the senate not more than three (3) of whom shall be from the same political party, and four (4) of whom shall be from the house of representatives to be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives not more than three (3) of whom shall be from the same political party. The selection of the chairperson, vice-chairperson, and secretary of the committee shall alternate biennially between the president of the senate and the speaker of the house.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 236, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 237, § 2.

22-7.10-2.
Duties.

It shall be the duty of the joint committee on energy to promote and encourage the development of effective and efficient plans, programs, strategies, and standards for energy conservation, energy efficiency, and energy resource procurement, use and development, including renewable energy, and in the furtherance to this purpose, it shall be the duty of the joint committee to provide oversight of the implementation of standard offer service through 2020 and all agencies and instrumentalities of the state with responsibility for energy programs, including, but not limited to, the office of energy resources, the Rhode Island energy efficiency and resources management council, the public utilities commission, and the division of public utilities.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 236, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 237, § 2.

22-7.10-3.
Reports and recommendations.

The joint committee on energy shall from time to time and at least annually report to the general assembly on its findings and the results of its studies, and make any recommendations to the general assembly and propose any legislation or initiate any studies that it shall deem advisable.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 236, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 237, § 2.

22-7.10-4.
References to committee.

Each branch of the legislature may refer to the joint committee, either initially or after action by other committees, all bills and resolutions dealing with or affecting energy.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 236, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 237, § 2.

22-7.10-5.
Technical assistance.

The joint committee shall, if it finds it cannot obtain proper assistance from available sources, contract for any technical services that it shall require to effectuate its purposes.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 236, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 237, § 2.

22-7.10-6.
Place of meeting — Quorum.

The joint committee on legislative services shall provide adequate space in the state house of the use of the joint committee on energy; provided, that the joint committee on energy may conduct hearings and hold meetings elsewhere when doing so will better serve its purposes. A majority in number of the joint committee on energy shall be necessary to constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 236, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 237, § 2.